Hawaii statutes.
[§435H-6] Eligibility of
insurers and plans. The commissioner shall determine eligibility for the
inclusion of insurers and plans; provided that all qualified plans and
qualified dental plans that apply for inclusion shall be included in the
connector. [L 2011, c 205, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next